South Dakota, session 2026, HB1232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-54-5 be AMENDED:
1-54-5. It is the policy of the state to consult with a tribal government regarding
the conduct of state government programs that have the potential of affecting tribal
members on a reservation. In developing or administering any program that has the
potential of affecting tribal members on a reservation, the state recognizes the following
guiding principles:
(1) Commitment to cooperation and collaboration between the agency and each Indian
tribe;
(2) Understanding of and respect for the Indian tribes as sovereign nations and the
government-to-government relationship between the state and each tribe;
(3) Regular and early communication with tribal officials;
(4) Accountability when addressing issues raised by tribal officials regarding the
program; and
(5) Preservation of the tribal-state relationship.
This section may not be construed to confer any substantive rights on any party in
any litigation or otherwise.

26.900.21 2 1232
An Act to establish principles for a state agency to consider when formulating or implementing
a program that has the potential of affecting tribal members on a reservation.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1232
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1232 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1232 ENROLLED